Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.191

Scheduled election lapses, when.

A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected, when a void in candidacy occurs following the special three-day filing period required by RCW 29A.24.181.

[ 2011 c 349 s 12; 2006 c 344 s 9; 2004 c 271 s 167.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349 ss 10-12, 27, 28, and 30: See note following RCW 29A.24.171.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.